North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-38 Income Tax
57-38-06.
General provisions applicable to nonresidents.

The provisions of law applicable to the assessment, levy, and collection of income taxes from resident individuals, as to income, taxable income, adjustments to taxable income, and the allocation or proration of any such items, and all other provisions not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter especially made applicable to nonresidents, govern the levy and collection of income taxes from nonresident individuals.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 4; 1925 Supp., § 2346a3; S.L. 1929, ch. 239, § 1; 1931, ch. 283, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 57-3806; S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 3; 1967, ch. 447, § 1.

57-38-06.1.
Exemptions for nonresident individual. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 545, § 32.

57-38-07.
Tax imposed on fiduciaries — Charge against estate or trust.

The tax imposed by this chapter applies to and becomes a charge against estates and trusts with respect to their taxable income as defined in this chapter and the rates must be the same as those applicable to individuals. The fiduciary is responsible for making the return of income for the estate or trust for which the fiduciary acts, whether such income is taxable to the estate or trust or to the beneficiaries thereof. Fiduciaries required to make returns are subject to all of the provisions of this chapter which apply to individuals.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, §§ 14, 15; 1925 Supp., §§ 2346a13, 2346a14; R.C. 1943, § 57-3807; S.L. 1959, ch. 393, § 3; 1967, ch. 449, § 1.

57-38-07.1.
Taxation of two or more member limited liability companies.

For purposes of this chapter, a limited liability company having two or more members that is formed under either the laws of this state or under similar laws of another state, and that is considered to be a partnership for federal income tax purposes, is considered to be a partnership and the members must be considered to be partners. A limited liability company having two or more members that is not treated as a partnership for federal income tax purposes must be treated as a corporation for state tax purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 15; 1997, ch. 103, § 244.

57-38-07.2.
Taxation of single-member limited liability companies.

For purposes of this chapter, a limited liability company having a single member which is formed under either the laws of this state or under similar laws of another state and that is considered to be a corporation for federal income tax purposes is considered to be a corporation for state tax purposes. A limited liability company having a single member which is not treated as a corporation for federal income tax purposes is disregarded as an entity separate from its owner for state tax purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 245.

57-38-08.
Partnerships not subject to tax.

Partnerships are not subject to tax under this chapter. Persons carrying on a business as partners are taxable on their respective shares of the partnership’s income, gain, loss, and deduction included in the partner’s federal taxable income, as provided under section 57-38-08.1.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 5; 1925 Supp., § 2346a4; R.C. 1943, § 57-3808; S.L. 1951, ch. 326, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 57-3808; S.L. 1985, ch. 630, § 3; 2001, ch. 525, § 2.

57-38-08.1.
Allocation and apportionment of partnership income — Taxation of partners.

A partnership that carries on its business activity entirely within this state shall report all of its income or loss to this state. A partnership that carries on its business activity within and without this state shall allocate and apportion its income or loss to this state in the same manner as the income or loss of a corporation is allocated and apportioned to the state under chapter 57-38.1.

Resident partners, limited to individuals, estates, and trusts, must report their entire distributive share to this state as provided in subdivision b of subsection 6 of section 57-38-04, and may claim a credit for taxes paid to another state on that portion of their distributive share attributable to and taxed by another state.

In determining the gross income of a nonresident partner, limited to individuals, estates, and trusts, there must be included only that part derived from or connected with sources in this state of the partner’s distributive share of items of partnership income, gain, loss and deduction, or item thereof, entering into the federal taxable income of the partner, as determined under section 57-38-04. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, guaranteed payments paid to nonresident partners of a partnership that has business activity in this state are treated as a distributive share of partnership income for state tax purposes. In the case of a professional service partnership, the portion of a guaranteed payment paid to a nonresident partner attributable to a reasonable salary may not be treated as a distributive share. The portion of the guaranteed payment not treated as a distributive share that is for services performed in this state must be assigned as provided under subsection 1 of section 57-38-04. For purposes of this subdivision, “professional service partnership” means a partnership that engages in the practice of law, accounting, medicine, and any other profession in which neither capital nor the services of employees are a material income-producing factor.

In determining the sources of a nonresident partner’s income, no effect shall be given to a provision in the partnership agreement which:

Characterizes payments to the partners as being for services or for the use of capital or allocates to the partner, as income or gain from sources outside this state, a greater proportion of the partner’s distributive share of partnership income or gain than the ratio of partnership income or gain from sources outside this state to partnership income or gain from all sources, except as authorized in subdivision d; or

Allocates to the partner a greater proportion of a partnership item of loss or deduction connected with sources in this state than the proportionate share of the partner, for federal income tax purposes, of partnership loss or deduction generally, except as authorized in subdivision d.

Any modification to federal taxable income described in this chapter that relates to an item of partnership income, gain, loss, or deduction, or item thereof, must be made in accordance with the partner’s distributive share, for federal income tax purposes, of the item to which the modification relates, but limited to the partner’s portion of the item derived from or connected with sources in this state.

On application, the commissioner may authorize the use of other methods of determining a nonresident partner’s portion of partnership items derived from or connected with sources in this state, and the related modifications, as may be appropriate and equitable, on the terms and conditions as it may require.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 525, § 3; 2009, ch. 545, § 25.

57-38-09.
Exempt organizations.

A person or organization exempt from federal income taxation under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, is also exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter in each year such person or organization satisfies the requirements of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, for exemption from federal income taxation. If the exemption applicable to any person or organization under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, is limited or qualified in any manner, the exemption from taxes imposed by this section must be limited or qualified in a similar manner.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1, the unrelated business taxable income, as computed under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, of any person or organization otherwise exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter and subject to the tax imposed on unrelated business income by the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, is subject to the tax which would have been imposed by this chapter but for the provisions of subsection 1.

In addition to the persons or organizations exempt from federal income taxation under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, there shall also be exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter insurance companies doing business in the state and paying a tax upon the gross amount of premiums received in the state.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 27; 1925 Supp., § 2346a26; R.C. 1943, § 57-3809; S.L. 1955, ch. 324, § 4; 1957 Supp., § 57-3809; S.L. 1961, ch. 357, § 11; 1983, ch. 631, § 1.

Collateral References.

Exemption of cooperative association from income or excess profits tax, 8 A.L.R.2d 925, 930.

Receipt of payment from beneficiaries as affecting tax exemption of charitable institutions, 37 A.L.R.3d 1191.

Nursing homes as exempt from property taxation, 34 A.L.R.5th 529.

Construction and Application of Uniform Division of Income for Tax Purposes Act (UDITPA) — Determination of Business Income. 74 A.L.R.6th 1.

57-38-09.1.
Organizations exempt from income tax — File return.

Any organization exempt from taxation pursuant to section 57-38-09 must provide the tax commissioner, in such form and manner as may be prescribed by the tax commissioner, information as is necessary to enable the tax commissioner to determine the exempt status of the organization.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 450, § 1; 1971, ch. 559, § 1; 1977, ch. 536, § 3; 1993, ch. 269, § 2.

57-38-10.
Allocation and apportionment of partnership income. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 525, § 4.

57-38-11.
Annual tax on corporations.

The tax imposed by this chapter must be levied, collected, and paid annually with respect to its North Dakota income, as hereinafter defined, received by every corporation doing business in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 6; 1925 Supp., § 2346a5; R.C. 1943, § 57-3811; 2003, ch. 528, § 1.

Collateral References.

Dividend in kind or stock dividend as affecting corporation’s income tax, 7 A.L.R.2d 750.

Income of subsidiary as taxable to it or to parent corporation, 10 A.L.R.2d 576.

Separate recognition of corporation and business organization of individual stockholders, 24 A.L.R.2d 470.

Validity, under federal constitution, of state tax on, or measure by, income of foreign corporation, 67 A.L.R.2d 1322.

57-38-12.
Allocation of corporation income. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 528, § 4.

57-38-13.
General provisions related to allocation of corporation income. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 528, § 4.

57-38-14.
General provisions relating to corporate income.

The following principles may be applied in determining North Dakota income:

Any corporation organized under the laws of North Dakota and subject to a tax under the provisions of this chapter, which maintains no regular place of business outside this state, except a statutory office, must be taxed upon its entire income.

Corporations engaged in business within and without this state may be taxed only on such income as is derived from business transacted and property located within this state. The amount of such income apportionable to North Dakota must be determined as provided in chapter 57-38.1.

Any corporation liable to report under this chapter and owning or controlling, either directly or indirectly, substantially all of the voting capital stock of another corporation, or of other corporations, may be required to make a consolidated report showing the combined income, such assets of the corporation as are required for the purposes of this chapter, and such other information as the tax commissioner may require, but excluding intercorporate stock holdings and intercorporate accounts.

Any corporation liable to report under this chapter and owned or controlled either directly or indirectly by another corporation may be required to make a report consolidated with the owning company, showing the combined income, such assets of the corporation as are required for the purposes of this chapter, and such other information as the tax commissioner may require, but excluding intercorporate stock holdings and intercorporate accounts.

In case it appears to the tax commissioner that any arrangement exists in such a manner as to reflect improperly the business done, the segregable assets, or the entire income earned from business done in this state, the tax commissioner is authorized and empowered, in such manner as the tax commissioner may determine, to adjust the tax equitably.

The tax commissioner may permit or require the filing of a combined report if substantially all the voting capital stock of two or more corporations liable to report under this chapter is owned or controlled by the same interests. The tax commissioner may impose the tax provided by this chapter as though the combined entire income and segregated assets were those of one corporation, but in the computation, dividends received from any corporation whose assets, as distinguished from shares of stock, are included in the segregations may not be included in the income.

When any corporation required to make a return under this chapter conducts the business, whether under agreement or otherwise, in such manner as directly or indirectly to benefit the members or stockholders of the corporation, or any of them, or any person or persons, directly or indirectly interested in such business, by selling its products, or the goods or commodities in which it deals, at less than a fair price which might be obtained therefor, or if such a corporation, a substantial portion of whose capital stock is owned either directly or indirectly by another corporation, acquires and disposes of the products of the corporation owning the substantial portion of its capital stock, in such manner as to create a loss or improper income, the tax commissioner may require such facts as the tax commissioner deems necessary for the proper computation provided by this chapter, and for the purposes of this chapter may determine the amount which must be deemed to be the entire income, of the business of such corporation for the calendar or fiscal year. In determining such entire income, the tax commissioner shall have regard to the fair profits which, but for any agreement, arrangement, or understanding, might be or could have been obtained from dealing in such products, goods, or commodities.

If it appears to the tax commissioner that the segregation of assets shown by any report made under this chapter does not reflect properly the corporate activity or business done, or the income earned from corporate activity, or from business done in this state because of the character of the corporation’s business and the character and location of its assets, the tax commissioner is authorized and empowered to adjust the tax equitably.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, two or more North Dakota domestic corporations, affiliated as parent and subsidiary, and filing a federal consolidated tax return, shall file a combined report and consolidated return for income tax under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 8, subs. a; 1925 Supp., § 2346a7; S.L. 1931, ch. 283, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 57-3814; S.L. 1977, ch. 540, § 1; 1995, ch. 560, § 1; 2003, ch. 528, § 2.

57-38-15.
Basis for determining gain or loss. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-15.1.
Capital gains and losses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-15.2.
No capital gain recognized on property involuntarily converted. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-15.3.
Gain or loss not recognized on certain exchanges. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-16.
Inventory — Use under direction of tax commissioner. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-17.
Gross income defined. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-17.1.
Income from back pay — Limitation of tax — Definition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-18.
Items not included in gross income. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-19.
Gross income of life insurance companies. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-20.
Basis of return of net income. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-21.
Net income defined — Computation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-22.
Deductions allowed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-22.1.
Deductions — Individuals. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-23.
Items not deductible. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1961, ch. 359, § 8.

57-38-24.
Net losses — Meaning — Exceptions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-25.
Net loss as a deduction. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1945, ch. 300, § 1.

57-38-26.
Exemption for individuals. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-27.
Exemption for fiduciaries. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-28.
Time for fixing exemption status. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 446, § 8.

57-38-29.
Optional method of computing tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 545, § 32.

57-38-29.1.
Energy cost relief credit. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 632, § 5, S.L. 1985, ch. 634, § 1.

57-38-29.2.
Credit for premiums for long-term care insurance coverage. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 545, § 32.

57-38-29.3.
Credit for premiums for long-term care partnership plan insurance coverage.

A credit against an individual’s tax liability under this chapter is provided to each taxpayer in the amount of the premiums paid during the taxable year by the taxpayer for qualified long-term care partnership plan insurance coverage for the taxpayer or the taxpayer’s spouse, or both. The credit under this section for each insured individual may not exceed two hundred fifty dollars in any taxable year. For purposes of this section, “qualified long-term care partnership plan” is one that:

Is a qualified long-term care insurance policy, as defined in section 7702B(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, with an issue date on or after the date specified in an approved Medicaid state plan amendment that provides for the disregard of assets;

Meets the requirements of the long-term care insurance model regulations and the long-term care insurance model act promulgated by the national association of insurance commissioners as adopted as of October 2000, or the insurance commissioner certifies that the policy meets those requirements; and

Is purchased by an individual who:

Has not attained age sixty-one as of the date of purchase, if the policy provides compound annual inflation protection;

Has attained age sixty-one but has not attained age seventy-six as of the date of purchase, if the policy provides some level of inflation protection; or

Has attained age seventy-six as of the date of purchase.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 550, § 1; 2011, ch. 459, § 7.

57-38-30.
Imposition and rate of tax on corporations.

A tax is hereby imposed upon the taxable income of every domestic and foreign corporation which must be levied, collected, and paid annually as in this chapter provided:

For the first twenty-five thousand dollars of taxable income, at the rate of one and forty-one hundredths percent.

On all taxable income exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars and not exceeding fifty thousand dollars, at the rate of three and fifty-five hundredths percent.

On all taxable income exceeding fifty thousand dollars, at the rate of four and thirty-one hundredths percent.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 26; 1925 Supp., § 2346a25; S.L. 1937, ch. 241, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 57-3830; S.L. 1967, ch. 452, § 1; I.M. approved November 7, 1978, S.L. 1979, ch. 687, § 2; S.L. 1981, ch. 594, § 3; 1983, ch. 632, § 3; 1985, ch. 634, § 1; 1987, ch. 691, § 4; 1989, ch. 711, § 1; 1991, ch. 670, § 3; 2003, ch. 523, § 4; 2003, ch. 528, § 3; 2005, ch. 559, § 2; 2009, ch. 535, § 4; 2011, ch. 54, § 9; 2011, ch. 457, § 6; 2013, ch. 451, § 3; 2015, ch. 447, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-38-30.1.
Corporate tax credit for new industry.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 512, § 1; 1971, ch. 560, § 1; 1973, ch. 470, § 1; 1995, ch. 561, § 1; Repealed by 2017, ch. 390, § 2, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016.

57-38-30.2.
Surtax on income. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 476, § 2.